Maryland, session 2026, HB0815.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Article XI–A – Local Legislation
3A.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0815*

HOUSE BILL 815
[The] SUBJECT TO SECTION 3B OF THIS ARTICLE, THE charter for the
government of any county governed by the provisions of this Article may provide for the
election of members of the county council by the voters of councilmanic districts therein
established, or by the voters of the entire county, or by a combination of these methods of
election.
3B.
BEGINNING IN 2032, THE ELECTION OF A MEMBER OF THE CECIL COUNTY
COUNCIL TO REPRESENT A SPECIFIC RESIDENCY DISTRICT SHALL BE DECIDED BY A
PLURALITY OF THE VOTES CAST WITHIN THAT DISTRICT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Education
3–4A–01.
(a) The Cecil County Board consists of six members as follows:
(1) One voting member elected from each of the five [commissioner]
COUNTY COUNCIL RESIDENCY districts BY A PLURALITY OF THE VOTES CAST WITHIN
THAT DISTRICT; and
(2) One nonvoting student member.
(b) The five voting members of the county board shall be elected at a general
election as required by subsection (c) of this section.
(c) (1) A member from a [county commissioner] COUNTY COUNCIL
RESIDENCY district shall be a resident of the district.
(2) A member from a [county commissioner] COUNTY COUNCIL
RESIDENCY district who no longer resides in the district may not continue as a member of
the county board.
(3) A candidate elected to the county board shall be a registered voter and
resident of Cecil County for at least 3 years.
(d) (1) Except as provided under subsection (e) of this section, each voting
member serves for a term of 4 years beginning on the first Monday in December after the
member’s election and until a successor is elected and qualifies.
(2) A voting member may not serve for more than three terms.

HOUSE BILL 815 3
(3) The Governor shall appoint a new member to fill any vacancy on the
county board for the remainder of that term and until a successor is elected and qualifies.
(e) The terms of the voting members are staggered as follows:
(1) Members of the county board from [commissioner] COUNTY COUNCIL
RESIDENCY districts 3, 4, and 5 shall be elected at the 2006 general election and every 4
years thereafter; and
(2) Members of the county board from [commissioner] COUNTY COUNCIL
RESIDENCY districts 1 and 2 shall be elected at the 2008 general election and every 4 years
thereafter.
(f) (1) The student member shall:
(i) Be an eleventh or twelfth grade student in the Cecil County
public school system elected by the high school students of the county in accordance with
procedures established by the school system;
(ii) Serve for 1 year beginning on July 1 after the election of the
member;
(iii) Be a nonvoting member; and
(iv) Advise the county board on the thoughts and feelings of students.
(2) Unless invited to attend by an affirmative vote of a majority of the
county board, the student member may not attend an executive session.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects only one county and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments apply.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings held in accordance with Article XIV.

HOUSE BILL 815
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect October 1, 2031.